Arkansas, session 2025, SB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U010U ATRS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U079U ATRS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE SE01
(3) D013N ATRS ASSOC DIR OF INFORMATION TECHNO 1 GRADE IT11
(4) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(5) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(6) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(7) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT06
*WFP008*
01/14/2025 8:24:18 AM WFP008

SB66
(8) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(9) N093N ATRS ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR FISCAL AFFAIRS 1 GRADE GS14
(10) N092N ATRS ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR OF OPERATIONS 2 GRADE GS14
(11) A006N ATRS INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS14
(12) G019C GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(13) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 1 GRADE GS12
(14) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(15) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(16) A110C SENIOR INVESTMENT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(17) G041C ATRS MEMBER SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(18) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(19) A037C INVESTMENT MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(20) A034C RETIREMENT SECTION MANAGER 6 GRADE GS09
(21) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 3 GRADE GS08
(22) A062C RETIREMENT COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS08
(23) A061C RETIREMENT INVESTMENT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS08
(24) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 6 GRADE GS07
(25) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(26) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(27) A078C RETIREMENT COUNSELOR 21 GRADE GS07
(28) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(29) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(30) A083C RETIREMENT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(31) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
(32) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(33) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(34) R037C BENEFITS TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(35) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(36) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 87

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: twenty (20)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
01/14/2025 8:24:18 AM WFP008

SB66
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, to be payable from the Teacher
Retirement Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $5,283,282
(02) EXTRA HELP 400,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,902,011
(04) OVERTIME 50,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,200,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,759
(C) PROF. FEES 558,115
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) BENEFITS 180,000,000
(07) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 15,000,000
(08) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 250,000
(09) INVESTMENT CONSULTANTS 3,500,000
(10) DISCOUNT BUYOUT PLAN 9,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $218,174,167

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, to be payable from cash funds as defined
by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for payments to beneficiaries by check or wire
transfer, by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/14/2025 8:24:18 AM WFP008

SB66
(01) BENEFITS-NON EMPLOYEE $1,700,000,000
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 6,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,706,000,000

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.


01/14/2025 8:24:18 AM WFP008